dev/verbs.chopped.dix
    <pardef n="iemāc/īt__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>īt</l>
          <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>īšu</l>
          <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>īt</l>
          <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>īsim</l>
          <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>īt</l>
          <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>īsi</l>
          <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>īt</l>
          <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>īsiet</l>
          <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>īsit</l>
          <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>īs</l>
          <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>īt</l>
          <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>īt</l>
          <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>īt</l>
          <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>īju</l>
          <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ījām</l>
          <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>īt</l>
          <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>īji</l>
          <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>īt</l>
          <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>īt</l>
          <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ījāt</l>
          <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>īt</l>
          <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>īja</l>
          <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>īt</l>
          <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>īt</l>
          <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ām</l>
          <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>īt</l>
          <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>īt</l>
          <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>āt</l>
          <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>īt</l>
          <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="atz/īt__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>īšu</l>
          <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>īsim</l>
          <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>īsi</l>
          <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>īsit</l>
          <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>īsiet</l>
          <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>īs</l>
          <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>īt</l>
          <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inu</l>
          <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inām</l>
          <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ini</l>
          <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ināt</l>
          <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ina</l>
          <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>īstu</l>
          <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>īstam</l>
          <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>īsti</l>
          <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>īstat</l>
          <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>īst</l>
          <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="atzīt"><i>atz</i><par n="atz/īt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="iemācīt"><i>iemāc</i><par n="iemāc/īt__vblex"/></e>
